California statutes. Education Code
(2) (A) For the 2021–22 fiscal year to the 2024–25 fiscal year, inclusive, a local educational agency with prior year classroom-based average daily attendance in kindergarten and grades 1 to 6, inclusive, shall not receive funding pursuant to paragraph (1) of less than fifty thousand dollars ($50,000).

(B) Commencing with the 2025–26 fiscal year, a local educational agency with
 prior year classroom-based average daily attendance in kindergarten and grades 1 to 6, inclusive, shall not receive funding pursuant to paragraph (1) of less than one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000).

(3) (A) Funds provided to a local educational agency pursuant to paragraph (1) shall be used to support pupil access to expanded learning opportunity programs, which may include, but is not limited to, hiring literacy coaches, high-dosage tutors, school counselors, and instructional day teachers and aides to assist pupils as part of the local educational agency’s program enrichment activities.

(B) Funds provided to a local educational agency pursuant to paragraph (1) may also be used to support attendance recovery pursuant to Article 9 (commencing with Section 46210) when attendance recovery is operated by a local educational agency in conjunction with, and
 on the same schoolsite as, its expanded learning opportunities program. A local educational agency that elects to use expanded learning opportunity program funds to support attendance recovery shall comply with the supervision requirements described in subdivision (f) of Section 46211.

(4) A local educational agency receiving funding pursuant to subparagraph (B) or (C) of paragraph (1) shall be provided at least three years of funding pursuant to that subparagraph upon becoming eligible to receive funding pursuant to that subparagraph. A local educational agency that does not meet the requirements of subparagraph (B) or (C) of paragraph (1) for four consecutive years shall be ineligible to receive funding pursuant to that subparagraph.

(5) The Superintendent shall proportionately reduce the amount of funding allocated pursuant to this section for a charter school that has ceased
 operation during the school year if school was actually taught in the charter school on fewer than 175 calendar days during that school year. The reduction shall be commensurate to the number of days that the charter school failed to operate due to the closure.

(6) (A) For the 2021–22 fiscal year, a school district or charter school may expend or encumber the funds received pursuant to this subdivision from the 2021–22 fiscal year to the 2023–24 fiscal year, inclusive. For the 2022–23 fiscal year, a school district or charter school may expend or encumber the funds received pursuant to this subdivision from the 2022–23 and 2023–24 fiscal years. Any encumbered funds pursuant to this paragraph that are not expended by the school district or charter school by September 30, 2024, shall be returned to the state.

(B) On or before October 31, 2024, each local
 educational agency that received an allocation pursuant to subparagraph (A), (B), or (D) of paragraph (1) for the 2021–22 fiscal year or the 2022–23 fiscal year shall report final expenditures to the department, which shall initiate collection of any unexpended funds. A local educational agency that does not submit the final expenditure report shall forfeit all funds allocated for the 2021–22 and 2022–23 fiscal years pursuant to subparagraphs (A), (B), and (D) of paragraph (1).

(C) (i) For the 2024–25 fiscal year, funds returned pursuant to subparagraph (A) shall be added to the amount of funds remaining from the appropriations in the calculation of the rate pursuant to subparagraph (D) of paragraph (1), and be expended consistent with paragraphs (9) and (10), up to the amount sufficient to provide the amount of two thousand dollars ($2,000) per unit of the local educational agency’s prior fiscal year second period
 reported kindergarten and grades 1 to 6, inclusive, classroom-based average daily attendance multiplied by the local educational agency’s unduplicated pupil percentage. Prior fiscal year average daily attendance and unduplicated pupil percentage shall be considered final as of the second principal apportionment for that fiscal year.

(ii) If there is insufficient funding to provide the full amount described in clause (i), the Superintendent may prorate that amount per unit.

(7) (A) For reorganized school districts, the prior fiscal year percentage of unduplicated pupils for purposes of paragraph (1) shall be calculated as follows:

(i) For a new or acquiring school district that has reorganized pursuant to paragraph (1), (2), or (3) of subdivision (a), or subdivision (b), of Section 35511, formed
 by all of two or more existing districts, combine the unduplicated pupils and total pupil enrollment of the original school districts.

(ii) For a new or acquiring school district that has reorganized pursuant to paragraph (1), (2), or (3) of subdivision (a), or subdivision (b), of Section 35511, formed by parts of one or more existing districts, and for the remaining portion of a divided district, or for a new school district formed as a result of a deunification pursuant to paragraph (4) of subdivision (a) of Section 35511, the county office of education with jurisdiction over the reorganized school district may provide to the department, under timelines and procedures established by the Superintendent, the unduplicated pupils and total pupil enrollment for the prior three fiscal years from each affected school district that will be served by each reorganized district, and the prior fiscal year unduplicated pupil percentage may be based on the
 unduplicated pupils and total pupil enrollment attributed to each reorganized school district. If the county office of education with jurisdiction over the reorganized school district does not provide to the department the unduplicated pupils and total pupil enrollment for the prior three fiscal years from each affected school district that will be served by each reorganized school district, the unduplicated pupils and total pupil enrollment shall be equal to the counts reported for the original school district.

(B) For reorganized school districts, the prior fiscal year average daily attendance for purposes of paragraph (1) shall be calculated as follows:

(i) For a new or acquiring school district that has reorganized pursuant to paragraph (1), (2), or (3) of subdivision (a), or subdivision (b), of Section 35511, the sum of the average daily attendance of the original school
 districts.

(ii) For a remaining portion of a divided school district, the average daily attendance attributed to that portion of the school district.

(iii) For a new school district formed as a result of a deunification pursuant to paragraph (4) of subdivision (a) of Section 35511, the average daily attendance of the former school district shall be attributed to the new school districts so that the sum of the average daily attendance for the new school districts equals the average daily attendance of the former school district.

(iv) For purposes of clauses (i), (ii), and (iii), the county superintendent of schools with jurisdiction over the reorganized school district shall provide to the department the prior fiscal year average daily attendance as of the second principal apportionment from each affected school
 district that will be served by each reorganized district.

(8) (A) (i) For the 2022–23 fiscal year to the 2025–26 fiscal year, inclusive, the department may allocate up to five million dollars ($5,000,000) of moneys appropriated for purposes of this subdivision to county offices of education to provide technical assistance, evaluation, and training services to support program
 improvement, in coordination with activities described in Section 8483.55. County offices of education already providing technical assistance pursuant to Section 8483.55 shall be prioritized to receive these funds.

(ii) Beginning with the 2026–27 fiscal year, the department may allocate up to seven million five hundred dollars ($7,500,000) of moneys appropriated for purposes of this subdivision to county offices of education to provide technical assistance, evaluation, and training services to support program improvement, in coordination with activities described in Section 8483.55 and the state transformation assistance center activities pursuant to Section 8902. County offices of education already providing technical assistance pursuant to Section 8483.55 shall be prioritized to receive these funds.

(B) Training and support shall include, but is not limited to, supporting local educational agencies with leveraging multiple funding initiatives to support expanded learning, including, but not limited to, community schools, school meal programs, and California state preschool programs.

(9) (A) Commencing with the 2023–24 fiscal year, any funds allocated pursuant to subparagraphs (B), (C), and (D) of paragraph (1) shall be expended by June 30 of the fiscal year following the fiscal year in which the appropriation is made. Any funds that are not expended by a local educational agency by the end of that period shall be returned to the state. On or before September 30 of the second fiscal year following the fiscal year in which the appropriation is made, each local educational agency receiving an allocation pursuant to subparagraph (B), (C), or (D) of paragraph (1)
 shall report final expenditures to the department, which shall initiate collection of any unexpended funds. A local educational agency that does not submit the final expenditure report shall forfeit all funds allocated for the fiscal year pursuant to subparagraph (B), (C), or (D) of paragraph (1).

(B) If a charter school receiving an allocation pursuant to subparagraph (B), (C), or (D) of paragraph (1) ceases to operate, a final expenditure report, using a template developed by the department, shall be due to the department within 60 days of the effective date of closure. The department shall collect any unspent amounts from funds allocated to the charter school in that fiscal year and the immediately preceding fiscal year.

(10) (A) Commencing with the 2025–26 fiscal year and annually thereafter, local educational agencies shall annually declare their
 operational intent to the department to run an expanded learning opportunity program pursuant to this section in accordance with instructions and forms prescribed and furnished by the Superintendent.

(B) To the extent possible, any funds made available by a local educational agency’s decision not to operate an expanded learning opportunity program may be reallocated pursuant to subparagraph (D) of paragraph (1).

(e) Commencing with the 2023–24 school year, the Superintendent, in consultation with the State Department of Social Services, shall establish a process and a timeline for local educational agencies that contract with third-party providers to operate expanded learning opportunity programs at a location other than a local educational agency’s school campus pursuant to this section, and California state preschool program providers pursuant to Chapter 2 (commencing with
 Section 8200) of Part 6 of Division 1 of Title 1, to annually submit program access information to the department, which shall distribute a compiled list to the State Department of Social Services for purposes of Community Care Licensing Division data collection and submission to the local educational agency’s applicable resource and referral agency. Information required to be submitted under this subdivision shall include, but not be limited to, all of the following:

(1) The name, address, and telephone number of each third party.

(2) The number of pupils being served by each third party, as well as the grade levels of those pupils.

(3) The State Department of Social Services child daycare facility license number of each third party, if applicable.

(4) A single point of contact for each local educational agency regarding expanded learning opportunity programs.

(f) By February 1, 2024, the Superintendent, in consultation with the State Department of Social Services, shall submit a report to the relevant fiscal and policy committees of the Legislature that includes all of the following:

(1) The number of expanded learning providers who are operating an expanded learning opportunity program for pupils enrolled in transitional kindergarten and kindergarten on a nonlocal educational agency site during the fiscal year, and how many pupils are provided access to these programs.

(2) The number of expanded learning providers who are operating an expanded learning opportunity program for pupils enrolled in transitional kindergarten and kindergarten on a
 nonlocal educational agency site during nonschooldays, and how many pupils are provided access to these programs.

(3) The number of expanded learning providers who are operating an expanded learning opportunity program for pupils enrolled in transitional kindergarten and kindergarten on a nonlocal educational agency site in the 2023–24 and 2024–25 fiscal years who are also licensed by the State Department of Social Services for purposes of community care licensing, the type of programs that are licensed by the State Department of Social Services for purposes of community care licensing, and how many pupils are provided access to their programs.

(4) A list of local educational agencies that contract with third-party providers that provide access to pupils on a nonlocal educational agency site during the fiscal year, how many contractors they work with, and the number of pupils
 provided access to these programs, by grade.

(5) A list of local educational agencies that contract with third-party providers that provide access to pupils on a nonlocal educational agency site during nonschooldays, how many contractors they work with, and the number of pupils provided access to these programs, by grade.

(g) For purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:

(1) “Expanded learning opportunities” has the same meaning as “expanded learning” is defined in Section 8482.1. “Expanded learning opportunities” does not mean an extension of instructional time, but rather, opportunities to engage pupils in enrichment, play, nutrition, and other developmentally appropriate activities.

(2) “Frontier designated geographic location” means
 a schoolsite in an area that has a population density of fewer than 11 persons per square mile.

(3) “Local educational agency” means a school district or charter school, excluding a charter school established pursuant to Section 47605.5.

(4) “Nonschooldays” means days not identified pursuant to subparagraph (A) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (b), inclusive of Saturdays, as described in Section 37223.

(5) “Offer access” means to recruit, advertise, publicize, or solicit through culturally and linguistically effective and appropriate communication channels, including, but not limited to, publishing program availability information in local educational agency pupil enrollment forms, on the local educational agency internet website, and posted publicly at each program site in a location accessible to the public.

(6) “Provide access,” with respect to an “expanded learning opportunity program,” means to enroll in the expanded learning opportunity program. If a parent or guardian has a signed expanded learning opportunity program registration form and that form is on file, the pupil shall be considered enrolled in the expanded learning opportunity program. For a local educational agency receiving an expanded learning opportunity program apportionment, transportation shall be provided for any pupil who attends a school that is not operating an expanded learning opportunity program to attend a location that is providing an expanded learning opportunity program and to return to their original location or another location that is established by the local educational agency.

(7) “Unduplicated pupil” has the same meaning as in Section 42238.02.

(h) For the 2021–22 fiscal year, the sum of seven hundred fifty-four million twenty-one thousand dollars ($754,021,000) is hereby appropriated from the General Fund to the Superintendent for allocation for the Expanded Learning Opportunities Program in the manner and for the purpose set forth in this section.

(i) For purposes of making the computations required by Section 8 of Article XVI of the California Constitution, the appropriation made by subdivision (h) shall be deemed to be “General Fund revenues appropriated for school districts,” as defined in subdivision (c) of Section 41202, for the 2020–21 fiscal year, and included within the “total allocations to school districts and community college districts from General Fund proceeds of taxes appropriated pursuant to Article XIIIB,” as defined in subdivision (e) of Section 41202, for the 2020–21 fiscal year.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2026, Ch. 65, Sec. 84.   (AB 126)   Effective July 9, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Junior High School and High School [46140. - 46149.]

46140.

No pupil in a high school, other than a pupil enrolled in a regional occupational center or program, evening high school, continuation high school, or continuation education class, shall be credited with more than one day of attendance in any calendar day and nothing in this article shall be construed to the contrary.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1230.)
-------------------------------------------

46140.1.

It is the intent of the Legislature that the term “pupil in a vocational education program occupationally organized and conducted under federal approval,” as used in Section 46140 as it read prior to the enactment of Chapter 1230 of the Statutes of 1977, applies only to pupils in regional occupational programs and centers.

Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, no funds appropriated by any act enacted prior to or after the enactment of this section, shall be deemed appropriated or available for expenditure for purposes of claims for attendance of pupils in vocational education programs occupationally organized and conducted under federal approval, other than for attendance of pupils in regional occupational centers or programs, arising from Section 46140 as it read prior to the enactment of Chapter 1230 of the Statutes of 1977, except for appropriations to fund the Settlement Agreement entered into on March 4, 1983, by and between the Fullerton Union High School District and the State Department of Education of the State of California, the Superintendent of Public Instruction of the State of California, and the Local Assistance Bureau in connection with that action otherwise known as Fullerton Union High School District, et al. v. Wilson Riles, Superintendent of Public Instruction, et al., Orange County Superior Court No. 33-46-93; and the Settlement Agreement entered into on March 4, 1983, by and between Rowland Unified School District and the State Department of Education of the State of California, the Superintendent of Public Instruction of the State of California, and the Local Assistance Bureau in connection with that action otherwise known as Rowland Unified School District, et al., v. Wilson Riles, Superintendent of Public Instruction, et al., Los Angeles Superior Court No. C 323905.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 268, Sec. 12.   Effective June 30, 1984.)
-------------------------------------------

46140.5.

Any school district which was credited with attendance of pupils pursuant to Section 46140 under a vocational education program occupationally organized and conducted under federal approval in 1976–77, other than a regional occupational program or regional occupational center, may request the county superintendent of schools to increase the district base revenue limit for fiscal year 1977–78 and fiscal years thereafter by the amount of revenue received on account of such vocational education attendance in 1976–77. The county superintendent, upon verification of such amounts, shall adjust the district’s base revenue limit.

As a clarification of the intent of the law, a district, which had not submitted attendance documents of pupils pursuant to Section 46140 under a vocational education program occupationally organized and conducted under federal approval in 1976–77, other than a regional occupational program or regional occupational center, at the time the attendance reports were originally due, shall not have the right at a later date to submit amended attendance documents to have credited this attendance.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1979, Ch. 1101.)
-------------------------------------------

46141.

The minimum schoolday in a high school is 240 minutes, except in an evening high school, an early college high school, a middle college high school, a dual enrollment program that is part of a College and Career Access Pathways dual enrollment partnership agreement that is consistent with the requirements of Section 76004, a regional occupational center, an opportunity school and in opportunity classes, a continuation high school, in continuation education classes, in late afternoon or Saturday occupationally organized vocational training programs conducted under a federally approved plan for vocational education, and for students enrolled in a work experience education program approved under the provisions of Article 7 (commencing with
 Section 51760) of Chapter 5 of Part 28.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2026, Ch. 65, Sec. 85.   (AB 126)   Effective July 9, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

46142.

(a) The minimum schoolday in any junior high school or high school described in Section 46141 may be computed by determining the number of minutes of attendance in any two consecutive schooldays and dividing that number by two. If the resulting quotient is 240 or more, the pupils shall be deemed to have complied with Section 46141, even if the number of minutes attended in any one schoolday is less than 240, but not less than 180.

(b) No computation authorized by this section shall result in any increase in state apportionments.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 922, Sec. 101.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

46144.

The minimum day in a special day or a Saturday vocational training program and for a pupil enrolled in a work experience education program approved under Article 7 (commencing with Section 51760) of Chapter 5 of Part 28, except for a pupil enrolled in a continuation school or class pursuant to Section 48402, is four periods totaling at least 180 minutes in duration, except that for a pupil in an approved work experience program who attends a school, other than a continuation school or class, in which the regularly scheduled period is greater than 60 minutes in length, the minimum day is one or more periods totaling at least 180 minutes in duration.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 72, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

46144.5.

(a) Notwithstanding any other law, commencing with the 2008–09 fiscal year, the minimum schoolday for a pupil concurrently enrolled in regular secondary school classes and classes operating pursuant to a joint powers agreement that became effective before January 1, 2008, is 180 minutes. These regular secondary school classes constitute regular school classes for purposes of Section 46010.3.

(b) For a pupil described in subdivision (a), the average daily attendance shall be included as school district average daily attendance computed pursuant to Section
 42238.05.

(c) For purposes of computing attendance pursuant to Section 46300 or any other law, immediate supervision and control of pupils while attending classes pursuant to a joint powers agreement described in subdivision (a) is deemed satisfied regardless of the school district employing the certificated employee providing the supervision and control, provided the school district is a party to the joint powers agreement.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 42238.20 by Stats. 2017, Ch. 47, Sec. 1.   (AB 760)   Effective July 10, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

46145.

Commencing with the first semester or quarter that begins after January 1, 1984, pupils in grade 12 shall be enrolled in at least five courses each semester or the equivalent number of courses per quarter. If any pupil in grade 12 is required by medical prescription to attend school for less than five courses during the semester or the equivalent number of courses during the quarter, the average daily attendance allowed for that pupil’s attendance shall bear the same proportion to one day of attendance as the number of courses in which the pupil is enrolled bears to five or the equivalent number for the quarter system.

However, this requirement shall not apply to pupils enrolled in regional occupational programs, regional occupational centers, courses at accredited postsecondary educational institutions, independent study, special education programs where the pupil’s individualized education program establishes a different number of courses, continuation education classes, work experience education programs approved under the provisions of Article 7 (commencing with Section 51760) of Chapter 5 of Part 28, or any other course of study authorized by the governing board which is equivalent to the approved high school course of study.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1597, Sec. 10.)
-------------------------------------------

46146.

(a) A day of attendance in grades 11 and 12 is 180 minutes of attendance if the pupil is also enrolled part time in classes of the California State University or the University of California for which academic credit will be provided upon satisfactory completion of enrolled courses.

(b) A day of attendance for any pupil who is also a special part-time student enrolled in a community college under Article 1 (commencing with Section 48800) of Chapter 5 of Part 27 and who will receive academic credit upon satisfactory completion of enrolled courses is 180 minutes of attendance.

(c) Notwithstanding any other
 law, for purposes of computing the average daily attendance of a pupil described in subdivision (a) or (b), the 180-minute minimum schoolday permitted by this section shall be computed and reported as attendance for three-quarters of the full 240-minute minimum schoolday prescribed by Section 46141, except as provided in Section 46146.5. Commencing with the 1995–96 fiscal year, if a pupil described in subdivision (a) or (b) is in attendance for more than 180 minutes, the average daily attendance of the pupil shall be computed and reported by determining the percentage of the full 240-minute minimum schoolday prescribed by Section 46141 that the pupil was in attendance at the school. No more than one full day of attendance may be reported for any pupil for any schoolday pursuant to this
 subdivision.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2026, Ch. 65, Sec. 86.   (AB 126)   Effective July 9, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

46146.5.

(a) A day of attendance is 180 minutes for a pupil enrolled in grade 11 or 12 in an early college high school, a middle college high school, or dual enrollment courses offered by a local educational agency with a College and Career Access Pathways partnership agreement consistent with the requirements of Section 76004 if the pupil is also enrolled part time in courses of the California State University or the University of California for which academic credit will be provided upon satisfactory completion of
 enrolled courses.

(b) A day of attendance is 180 minutes for a pupil enrolled in an early college high school, a middle college high school, or dual enrollment courses offered by a local educational agency with a College and Career Access Pathways partnership agreement who is also a special part-time student enrolled in a community college under Article 1 (commencing with Section 48800) of Chapter 5 of Part 27, and who will receive academic credit upon satisfactory completion of enrolled
 courses.

(c) A day of attendance is 240 minutes for a pupil enrolled in an early college high school, a middle college high school, or dual enrollment courses offered by a local educational agency with a College and Career Access Pathways partnership agreement who does not satisfy subdivision (a) or (b).

(d) For a charter school that is an early college high school or middle college high school, for purposes of
 calculating classroom-based average daily attendance for classroom-based instruction apportionments, at least 80 percent of the instructional time offered by the charter school shall be at the schoolsite, and the charter school shall require the attendance of a pupil enrolled in grade 11 or 12 for a minimum of 50 percent of the minimum instructional time required to be offered pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 47612.5 if the pupil is also enrolled part time in courses of the California State University or the University of California for which academic credit will be provided upon satisfactory completion of enrolled courses.

(e) For a charter school that is an early college high school or middle college high school, for purposes of calculating classroom-based average daily attendance for classroom-based instruction apportionments, at least 80 percent of the instructional time offered by the charter school shall be at the
 schoolsite, and the charter school shall require the attendance of a pupil for a minimum of 50 percent of the minimum instructional time required to be offered pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 47612.5 if the pupil is also a special part-time student enrolled in a community college under Article 1 (commencing with Section 48800) of Chapter 5 of Part 27, and who will receive academic credit upon satisfactory completion of enrolled courses.

(f) For a pupil enrolled in a charter school that is an early college high school or middle college high school and who does not satisfy the attendance and enrollment requirements of subdivision (d) or (e), for purposes of calculating classroom-based average daily attendance for classroom-based instruction apportionments, at least 80 percent of the instructional time offered by the charter school shall be at the schoolsite, and the charter school shall require the attendance of the pupil
 for a minimum of 67 percent of the minimum instructional time required to be offered pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 47612.5.

(g) For purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:

(1) “College and Career Access Pathways partnership agreement” has the same meaning as described in Section 76004.

(2) “Early college high school” has the same meaning as described in Section 11302.

(3) “Local educational agency” means a school district, county office of education, or charter school.

(4) “Middle college high school” has the same meaning as described in Section 11300.

(h) The requirements of this
 section shall be subject to annual audits, which shall be conducted pursuant to Section 41020.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2026, Ch. 250, Sec. 18.   (SB 133)   Effective September 18, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

46147.

Notwithstanding the 180-minute minimum day requirement of Section 46144, the governing board of any school district may permit a 12th-grade pupil in his or her last semester or quarter, as the case may be, before graduation, who is enrolled in a work experience education program approved under the provisions of Article 7 (commencing with Section 51760) of Chapter 5 of Part 28 and who would complete all of the requirements for graduation by attending high school, except courses of physical education, for less than 180 minutes each day, to attend high school for less than a minimum day of 180 minutes, upon the written request of a parent or legal guardian or upon his or her own request if the pupil is 18 years of age or over. If a pupil attends classes for less than 180 minutes per day pursuant to this section, the number of minutes actually attended per day shall be rounded down to the nearest multiple of 60. The average daily attendance allowed for that pupil’s attendance shall bear the same proportion to one day of attendance as the number of minutes of attendance per day bears to 180.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 498, Sec. 79.   Effective July 28, 1983.)
-------------------------------------------

46148.

(a) (1) The schoolday for high schools, including high schools operated as charter schools, shall begin no earlier than 8:30 a.m.

(2) The schoolday for middle schools, including middle schools operated as charter schools, shall begin no earlier than 8:00 a.m.

(b) For purposes of this section, “schoolday” has the same meaning as defined by the school district or charter school for purposes of calculating average daily attendance in order to compute any apportionments of state funding. This section does not prohibit a school district or charter school from offering classes or activities to a limited number of pupils before the start of the schoolday that do not generate average daily attendance for purposes of computing any apportionments of state funding.

(c) This section shall be implemented by middle schools and high schools no later than July 1, 2022, or the date on which a school district’s or
 charter school’s respective collective bargaining agreement that is operative on January 1, 2020, expires, whichever is later.

(d) This section shall not apply to rural school districts.

(e) The department is encouraged to post on its internet website available research on the impact of sleep deprivation on adolescents and the benefits of a later school start time and examples of successful strategies for managing the change to a later school start time, and to advise school districts and charter schools of this posting.

(f) The Legislature encourages school districts, charter schools, and community organizations to inform their communities, including parents, teenagers, educators, athletic coaches, and other stakeholders, about the health, safety, and academic impact of sleep deprivation on middle and high school
 pupils and the benefits of a later school start time, and to discuss local strategies to successfully implement the later school start time.

(History: Added by Stats. 2019, Ch. 868, Sec. 1.   (SB 328)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

46149.

Notwithstanding any other law, a school district, county office of education, or charter school that offers grades 10 and 12 shall also offer and enroll pupils in grade 11.

(History: Added by Stats. 2026, Ch. 65, Sec. 88.   (AB 126)   Effective July 9, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3.5. State High School Attendance Awards [46150. - 46150.]

46150.

It is the intent of the Legislature that efforts by high school faculty, staff, and students to improve student attendance at their schools be recognized. It is also the intent of the Legislature that this recognition shall be provided through a state high school attendance awards program, if feasible.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 36, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Alternative Schedule—Junior High and High School [46160. - 46162.]

46160.

(a) (1) Notwithstanding any other law, the governing board of a school district that maintains a junior high school or high school may schedule classes in these schools so that each pupil attends classes for at least 1,200 minutes during any five-schoolday period or 2,400 minutes during any 10-schoolday period.

(2) Notwithstanding any other law, the governing board of a school district that maintains an early college high school or middle college high school, or dual enrollment program with a College and Career Access Pathways partnership agreement consistent with the
 requirements of Section 76004, may schedule classes in these schools so that each pupil who satisfies subdivision (a) or (b) of Section 46146.5 attends classes for at least 900 minutes during any 5-schoolday period or 1,800 minutes during any 10-schoolday period.

(b) Under a schedule pursuant to subdivision (a), any pupil may be authorized to attend school for less than the total number of days in which the school is in session as long as the pupil attends the required number of minutes per 5-schoolday period or
 per 10-schoolday period to accommodate career technical education and regional occupational center and program courses and block or other alternative school class schedules.

(c) Computations authorized by this section shall not result in an increase in state apportionments to a school district.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2026, Ch. 250, Sec. 19.   (SB 133)   Effective September 18, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

46161.

If a pupil attends classes pursuant to a schedule adopted under the authority of this chapter, he shall be deemed to have complied with all of the requirements of this code relating to school attendance.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

46162.

Prior to implementing a program under the provisions of this chapter in any school of the district, the school district governing board shall consult in good faith in an effort to reach agreement with the certificated and classified employees of the school, with the parents of pupils who would be affected by the change, and with the community at large. Such consultation shall include at least one public hearing for which the board has given adequate notice to the employees and to the parents of pupils affected.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Minimum Day—Continuation Schools [46170. - 46170.]

46170.

(a) In continuation high schools and continuation education classes, a day of attendance is 180 minutes of attendance, but no pupil shall be credited with more than 15 hours of attendance per school week, proportionately reduced for those school weeks having weekday holidays on which classes are not held.

(b) Notwithstanding subdivision (a) and any other law, the governing board of a school district that maintains a continuation high school or continuation education classes may offer youth workforce development programs to pupils on one or two weekdays per school week if it ensures that they are otherwise enrolled in at least 15 hours of class attendance per school week.

 (c) A school district that
 implements a youth workforce development program for purposes of this section shall establish procedures to track pupil attendance and pupil participation while engaging in a youth workforce development program.

(d) (1) For purposes of this section, “youth workforce development program” means a program implemented by a continuation high school or school offering continuation education classes, under the supervision of a certificated employee, which enables pupils to earn either academic credit or an industry certificate while engaging in workplace experiences, or workforce development training, with the goal of providing the pupils with the skills and experience necessary to obtain employment at a livable wage following graduation. A youth workforce development program shall be aligned to pupil skills and in-demand careers and provide pupils with technical training and soft skills. A youth workforce development program